New Jersey, session 221, A876.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  The New Jersey Housing and Mortgage Finance Agency shall establish, and make available on the Internet website of the New Jersey Housing Resource Center or its successor, a singular online application for individuals to pre-apply to multiple affordable and senior housing units and housing developments at one time.  The application shall serve only as a pre-application to determine initial eligibility and standing on waitlists for the available housing and shall not serve as a final determination of eligibility.  The application shall provide an individual the ability to select specific municipalities, counties, and general regions of the State for housing they wish to pre-apply.  The application shall be applicable to all housing listed on the centers website, which shall include, but is not limited to: rental housing, for-sale housing, temporary housing, and priority housing. b.  The agency, in collaboration with the Division of Housing and Community Resources in the Department of Community Affairs, shall consolidate all applications for housing and housing related subsidies provided under any State or federal subsidy program into one application which shall be incorporated into the singular online application established pursuant to subsection a. of this section.  The application consolidating housing and housing related subsidy applications shall have the capability to serve as a final determination of eligibility. The consolidated application shall include, but shall not be limited to: (1)  the Section 8: Housing Choice Voucher Program; (2)  the State Rental Assistance Program; (3)  Housing Opportunities for People with AIDS; (4)  Veterans Affairs Supportive Housing; (5)  the Homeless Prevention Program; (6)  the Homeless Prevention and Rapid Re-Housing Program; (7)  the Low Income Home Energy Assistance Program; (8)  the Universal Service Fund; (9)  the Weatherization Assistance Program; and (10)  the Lead-Safe Home Remediation Program. c.  The agency shall, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), adopt rules or regulations as are necessary to effectuate the provisions of this act. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.